Utah statutes.
4-25-12.   Permitting swine to trespass after notice -- Class "C" misdemeanor.

The owner or person in control of any swine that permits it to trespass upon the improved private property of another person within three days after receipt of written notice demanding that the owner or person in control prevent further trespass is guilty of a class "C" misdemeanor; provided, that the owner or person in control of the swine is entitled to a reasonable time after notice for removal of the trespassing animal.

